District of Columbia statutes.
7-2040

Revocation, suspension, denial of license.

The Mayor may, subject to the right to a hearing, refuse to issue, revoke, suspend, or deny renewal of a license to operate a child development facility to a person who is found to have:

(1)

Failed to comply with the provisions of this subchapter and any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this subchapter;

(2)

Failed to comply with other federal and District laws applicable to child development facilities;

(3)

Committed, aided, abetted, or permitted to be committed any act of dishonesty, fraud, gross negligence, abuse, assault, battery, or other illegal acts related to the operation of the facility; or

(4)

Been convicted of a crime involving moral turpitude.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 11, 46 DCR 274
For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.
See notes to § 7-2031.
1981 Ed., § 6-3630.